Alaska, session 34, HB226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 18.56.470(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) The interest rate on a mortgage loan originated or purchased in whole or in 06 part under AS 18.56.420 for small community housing or multi-family housing under 07 AS 18.56.580 is one percent less than the interest rate, as determined under 08 AS 18.56.098(f)(1) - (4), on a mortgage loan purchased under AS 18.56.098(a) from 09 the proceeds of the most recent applicable issue of taxable bonds before the 10 origination or purchase of the mortgage loan originated or purchased under 11 AS 18.56.420. However, the portion of a loan that exceeds $400,000, adjusted 12 annually for inflation on July 1 of each year based on the percentage increase in 13 the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for urban Alaska during the 14 previous calendar year, as determined by the United States Department of 01 Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, has [INTEREST RATE ON THAT PORTION 02 OF A LOAN THAT EXCEEDS $250,000 IS THE SAME AS] the interest rate 03 determined under AS 18.56.098(f)(1) - (4). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.